lexc/noun/enhumely.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat] +Pref+

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§J§ §JP§
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§ §oeoez18§ §OEOE18§
§ooez19§ §EOA18§ §oeoez27§ 

LEXICON Root
Noun;
Prefnum;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:egy   Noun1;
+Pref+:két   Noun1;
+Pref+:kettő   Noun1;
+Pref+:három   Noun1;
+Pref+:négy   Noun1;
+Pref+:öt   Noun1;
+Pref+:hat   Noun1;
+Pref+:hét   Noun1;
+Pref+:hetes   Noun1;
+Pref+:nyolc   Noun1;
+Pref+:kilenc   Noun1;
+Pref+:tíz   Noun1;
+Pref+:húsz   Noun1;
+Pref+:huszonöt   Noun1;
+Pref+:harminc   Noun1;
+Pref+:negyven   Noun1;
+Pref+:ötven   Noun1;
+Pref+:hatvan   Noun1;
+Pref+:hetven   Noun1;
+Pref+:nyolcvan  Noun1;
+Pref+:kilencven   Noun1;
+Pref+:száz   Noun1;
+Pref+:ezer   Noun1;
+Pref+:millió   Noun1;
                Noun1;

Lexicon Noun1
almi AddNouni;
falatnyi AddNouni;
kocsis AddNoun;
milliónyi AddNouni;
napi AddNouni;
párti AddNouni;
százaléknyi AddNouni;
tucatnyi AddNouni;
órányi AddNouni;
órási AddNouni;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Noun2;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Noun2;
+Pref+:széjjel   Noun2;
+Pref+:szembe   Noun2;
+Pref+:szerte   Noun2;
+Pref+:vissza   Noun2;
+Pref+:helyre   Noun2;
+Pref+:tovább   Noun2;
+Pref+:tönkre   Noun2;
+Pref+:észre   Noun2;
+Pref+:rajta   Noun2;
+Pref+:előre   Noun2;
+Pref+:félbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:félre   Noun2;
+Pref+:felül   Noun2;
+Pref+:fölül   Noun2;
+Pref+:agyon   Noun2;
+Pref+:ellen   Noun2;
+Pref+:körbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:körül   Noun2;
+Pref+:közbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:közre   Noun2;
+Pref+:külön   Noun2;
+Pref+:utána   Noun2;
+Pref+:végbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:végig   Noun2;
+Pref+:hátra   Noun2;
+Pref+:hozzá   Noun2;
+Pref+:egybe   Noun2;
+Pref+:ketté   Noun2;
+Pref+:össze   Noun2;
+Pref+:mellé   Noun2;
+Pref+:által   Noun2;
+Pref+:alul   Noun2;
+Pref+:haza   Noun2;
+Pref+:újra   Noun2;
+Pref+:abba   Noun2;
+Pref+:neki   Noun2;
+Pref+:bele   Noun2;
+Pref+:újjá   Noun2;
+Pref+:benn   Noun2;
+Pref+:fenn   Noun2;
+Pref+:fönn   Noun2;
+Pref+:jóvá   Noun2;
+Pref+:szét   Noun2;
+Pref+:tele   Noun2;
+Pref+:tova   Noun2;
+Pref+:meg   Noun2;
+Pref+:oda   Noun2;
+Pref+:elő   Noun2;
+Pref+:túl   Noun2;
+Pref+:alá   Noun2;
+Pref+:föl   Noun2;
+Pref+:ide   Noun2;
+Pref+:fel   Noun2;
+Pref+:rá   Noun2;
+Pref+:ki   Noun2;
+Pref+:le   Noun2;
+Pref+:el   Noun2;
+Pref+:át   Noun2;
+Pref+:be   Noun2;
            Noun2;

Lexicon Noun2
adószámítási AddNouni;
bocsátási AddNouni;
bírálási AddNouni;
futási AddNouni;
hangolási AddNouni;
hidalási AddNouni;
kapcsolási AddNouni;
maradottsági AddNouni;
olvasztási AddNouni;
strukturálási AddNouni;
számoltatási AddNouni;
számolási AddNouni;
utaztatási AddNouni;
vonulási AddNouni;
váltási AddNouni;
állási AddNouni;


!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNouni
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;



LEXICON AddNoun1mely
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1mely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1mely;

LEXICON Poss1mely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez19§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA18§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez27§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE18§m   Fam1mely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE18§d   Fam1mely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam1mely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam1mely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE18§t§OEOE25§k   Fam1mely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam1mely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam1mely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam1mely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam1mely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam1mely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam1mely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam1mely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Plur1mely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez18§k    Gen1mely;
        
LEXICON Fam1mely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1mely;
                       Gen1mely;

LEXICON Gen1mely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1mely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1mely;
                       Case1mely;
 

LEXICON Noun
akciómozi AddNouni;
alexandrin AddNoun;
aranyklorid AddNoun;
autóbuszpótkocsi AddNouni;
belsőgumi AddNouni;
berbécsjáték AddNoun;
bisztrókocsi AddNouni;
bugasztori AddNouni;
burgonyahulladék AddNoun;
bébikori AddNouni;
bűvészmozi AddNouni;
ceruzajáték AddNoun;
csarnokmozi AddNouni;
csokisuli AddNouni;
csonthulladék AddNoun;
csőmozi AddNouni;
digitális AddNoun;
diákmozi AddNouni;
dögdoki AddNouni;
elefantiázis AddNoun;
esetkocsi AddNouni;
etilpirolízis AddNoun;
fejtőkocsi AddNouni;
felnőttpraxis AddNoun;
fiákerkocsi AddNouni;
formulakocsi AddNouni;
foszgenit AddNoun;
fékgumi AddNouni;
fóliahulladék AddNoun;
függőkocsi AddNouni;
gamásli AddNouni;
gipszbázis AddNoun;
grundsuli AddNouni;
gyorspostakocsi AddNouni;
gyufajáték AddNoun;
gőzkocsi AddNouni;
halfasírt AddNoun;
hangkocsi AddNouni;
hetvenannyi AddNouni;
hidrotermális AddNoun;
hugi AddNouni;
háttéranalízis AddNoun;
húzókocsi AddNouni;
ifjú:ifj AddNoun1mely;
indexdesign AddNoun;
japcsi AddNouni;
jelzőbódé AddNoun;
kalandsztori AddNouni;
karakteranalízis AddNoun;
kaucsukgumi AddNouni;
kezdősztori AddNouni;
kiadványválaszték AddNoun;
kismozi AddNouni;
koncertklasszis AddNoun;
kormánykocsi AddNouni;
krumplifasírt AddNoun;
kutyakocsi AddNouni;
kérdésadatbázis AddNoun;
könyvtárkocsi AddNouni;
labdarúgóbázis AddNoun;
lakkgumi AddNouni;
luxuskocsi AddNouni;
lángpirolízis AddNoun;
lóversenysztori AddNouni;
marhafasírt AddNoun;
melléksztori AddNouni;
mikrocsík AddNoun;
mixersuli AddNouni;
multimátrix AddNoun;
murvagumi AddNouni;
mókuci AddNouni;
múltsík AddNoun;
negyvennyolcórai AddNouni;
noradrenalin AddNoun;
nászkocsi AddNouni;
offenzív AddNoun;
orsókocsi AddNouni;
pandúrjáték AddNoun;
parni AddNouni;
periferiális AddNoun;
pompakocsi AddNouni;
pomádé AddNoun;
prolisuli AddNouni;
pszichózis AddNoun;
pólósuli AddNouni;
randibugyi AddNouni;
reflektorválaszték AddNoun;
rezsókocsi AddNouni;
rádióhangjáték AddNoun;
rádiómozi AddNouni;
selyembugyi AddNouni;
seprőparéj AddNoun;
spiccgumi AddNouni;
szakanalízis AddNoun;
szalonmotorkocsi AddNouni;
szerelékkocsi AddNouni;
szerpentinparádé AddNoun;
szobakocsi AddNouni;
szolgálóleányi AddNoun;
színészparádé AddNoun;
szívógumi AddNouni;
sátánsztori AddNouni;
takonycsík AddNoun;
talkedli AddNouni;
tartógumi AddNouni;
tenyéranalízis AddNoun;
teremgépkocsi AddNouni;
tisztítógumi AddNouni;
toleranciadózis AddNoun;
turbókémsztori AddNouni;
táplálékbázis AddNoun;
térdpárnagumi AddNouni;
törősík AddNoun;
túrababakocsi AddNouni;
variábilis AddNoun;
versenygumi AddNouni;
villanymotorkocsi AddNouni;
világsík AddNoun;
váltógumi AddNouni;
vérgázanalízis AddNoun;
zenesuli AddNouni;
zöldségparéj AddNoun;
álbaloldali AddNouni;
élvezetmozi AddNouni;
érintősík AddNoun;
öntözőkocsi AddNouni;
ügyfélbázis AddNoun;
őrségkocsi AddNouni;
Alkér AddNoun;
Barbacs AddNoun;
Bukin AddNoun;
Csákánydoroszló AddNoun;
Erdőalja AddNoun;
Gyarmat AddNoun;
Hari AddNouni;
Hodos AddNoun;
Kalotaszentkirály AddNoun;
Kistarcsa AddNoun;
Kóspallag AddNoun;
Martos AddNoun;
Nagydorog AddNoun;
Nádudvar AddNoun;
Pusztaottlaka AddNoun;
Szaporca AddNoun;
Sályi AddNouni;
Tormás AddNoun;
Álmosd AddNoun;
Andai AddNouni;
Badányi AddNouni;
Baranski AddNouni;
Belányi AddNouni;
Bergengócia AddNoun;
Boroviczényi AddNouni;
Bánóczi AddNouni;
Csikvári AddNouni;
Dabis AddNoun;
Danczi AddNouni;
Failoni AddNouni;
Gajári AddNouni;
Gonda AddNoun;
Gvadányi AddNouni;
Hollósi AddNouni;
Jani AddNouni;
Jankovics AddNoun;
Kapronczai AddNouni;
Koltányi AddNouni;
Krizsán AddNoun;
Kájoni AddNouni;
Legányi AddNouni;
Martonfalvi AddNouni;
Meinhardt AddNoun;
Nemessányi AddNouni;
Petrási AddNouni;
Pheidiasz AddNoun;
Rozványi AddNouni;
Sigmond AddNoun;
Szecsodi AddNouni;
Tavasi AddNouni;
Traviata AddNoun;
Uzonyi AddNouni;
Áltorjai AddNouni;
Absolonné AddNoun;
Beliczayné AddNoun;
Busóné AddNoun;
Darnayné AddNoun;
Falkonerné AddNoun;
Giglerné AddNoun;
Hegyeshalmyné AddNoun;
Jobbágyiné AddNoun;
Kolbenheyerné AddNoun;
Lajosné AddNoun;
Marosiné AddNoun;
Nagyiványiné AddNoun;
Pethőné AddNoun;
Renczné AddNoun;
Schulekné AddNoun;
Szeibertné AddNoun;
Thalhammerné AddNoun;
Viktorné AddNoun;
Zöllnerné AddNoun;
Áronné AddNoun;
